Rhode Island, session 2026, SB2965.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 42-127.1-8 of the General Laws in Chapter 42-127.1 entitled
"Uniform Electronic Transactions Act" is hereby amended to read as follows:
42-127.1-8. Provision of information in writing — Presentation of records.
(a) If parties have agreed to conduct a transaction by electronic means and a law requires
a person to provide, send, or deliver information, in writing, to another person, the requirement is
satisfied if the information is provided, sent, or delivered, as the case may be, in an electronic record
capable of retention by the recipient at the time of receipt. An electronic record is not capable of
retention by the recipient if the sender or its information processing system inhibits the ability of
the recipient to print or store the electronic record.
(b) If a law other than this chapter requires a record:
(1) to be posted or displayed in a certain manner;
(2) to be sent, communicated, or transmitted by a specified method, or
(3) to contain information that is formatted in a certain manner, the following rules apply:
(i) The record must be posted or displayed in the manner specified in the other law.
(ii) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (d)(2), the record must be sent,
communicated, or transmitted by the method specified in the other law.
(iii) The record must contain the information formatted in the manner specified in the other
law.

(c) If a sender inhibits the ability of a recipient to store or print an electronic record, the
electronic record is not enforceable against the recipient.
(d) The requirements of this section may not be varied by agreement, but:
(1) To the extent a law other than this chapter requires information to be provided, sent, or
delivered in writing but permits that requirement to be varied by agreement, the requirement under
subsection (a) that the information be in the form of an electronic record capable of retention may
also be varied by agreement; and
(2) A requirement under a law other than this chapter to send, communicate, or transmit a
record by first-class mail, postage prepaid or regular United States mail, may be varied by
agreement to the extent permitted by the other law; and
(3) A party may condition their agreement to conduct a transaction by electronic means
based upon their stated desire to obtain and receive a written copy of the document in English or
Spanish, before electronic execution of any agreement or any performance is required of the party.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC005526
========
LC005526 - Page 2 of 3